Montana, session 2025, SB95.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Allocation. (1) There is allocated $500,000 $300,000 from the state special revenue
account established in 17-6-603 to the department of public health and human services for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, for grants made pursuant to 53-21-1101 and 53-21-1111 for suicide prevention
activities.
(2) The allocation must be used to:
(a) implement strategies that are developed, with assistance from the U.S. department of veterans
affairs and the federal substance abuse and mental health services administration, as part of the mayor's
challenge or the governor's challenge Montana department of public health and human services' campaign to
prevent suicide among service members, veterans, and their families;
(b) identify and screen service members, veterans, and their families for suicide risk by:
(i) establishing screening standards for the identification of suicide risk among service members,
veterans, and their families;
(ii) educating providers and peers involved in the intake process; and
(iii) establishing a review process for identification of service members, veterans, and their families
in mortality and data review;
(c) promote connectedness and improve care transitions for service members, veterans, and their
families by:
(i) increasing peers who are trained in suicide prevention to work in connecting those individuals
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 95
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 95
to services; and
(ii) developing collaborative policies and protocols across military and civilian agencies to improve
continuity of care; and
(d) increase lethal means safety and safety planning by:
(i) implementing a safe storage campaign statewide;
(ii) conducting statewide lethal means safety training events; and
(iii) convening a working group to support adoption of clinical practice guidelines for safety
planning.
(3) The department shall report on the results of the activities described in this section as part of its
annual performance report required under 2-12-105.
Section 2. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a copy of [this act]
to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
Section 4. Termination. [This act] terminates June 30, 2027.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 95
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 95, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 95
INTRODUCED BY M. YAKAWICH
AN ACT ALLOCATING MONEY FOR SUICIDE PREVENTION EFFORTS FOR VETERANS AND SERVICE
MEMBERS; ESTABLISHING PURPOSES FOR USE OF THE MONEY; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE
DATE AND A TERMINATION DATE.”